custom-dicts/ia.aff
FLAG UTF-8
SFX T Y 30
SFX T   0   0       .         is:sg po:sb
SFX T   um  a       um        is:pl po:sb
SFX T   on  a       on        is:pl po:sb
SFX T   0   e       old       is:pl po:sb
SFX T   0   er      i[es][td] is:pl po:sb
SFX T   und ünde    und       is:pl po:sb
SFX T   opf öpfe    opf       is:pl po:sb
SFX T   0   e       [hlv]     is:pl po:sb
SFX T   0   e       ath       is:pl po:sb
SFX T   0   e       nig       is:pl po:sb   #   allow   ...igs
SFX T   0   e       illing    is:pl po:sb   #   allow   ...ings
SFX T   0   e       esling    is:pl po:sb   #   allow   ...ings
SFX T   0   er      isling    is:pl po:sb   #   allow   ...ings
SFX T   ock öcke    ock       is:pl po:sb   #   allow   ...stocks
SFX T   ack äcke    ack       is:pl po:sb   #   allow   ...sacks
SFX T   ann änner   ann       is:pl po:sb
SFX T   0   e       [hir]n    is:pl po:sb
SFX T   an  en      an        is:pl po:sb
SFX T   0   e       eis       is:pl po:sb
SFX T   0   se      [tn]is    is:pl po:sb
SFX T   aps äpse    aps       is:pl po:sb
SFX T   0   e       [sr][sz]  is:pl po:sb
SFX T   aus äuser   aus       is:pl po:sb
SFX T   0   e       [au]t     is:pl po:sb
SFX T   0   e       rst       is:pl po:sb
SFX T   0   en      nz        is:pl po:sb
SFX T   f   ves     [ea]lf    is:pl po:sb
SFX T   0   x       [ie][ae]u is:pl po:sb
SFX T   0   s       y         is:pl po:sb
SFX T   y   ies     y         is:pl po:sb

SFX U Y 13
SFX U   0   0       .               is:sg po:sb
SFX U   ice ex      ice             is:sg po:sb
SFX U   ce  x       [^i]ce          is:sg po:sb
SFX U   de  s       [aiy]de         is:sg po:sb
SFX U   ge  x       ge              is:sg po:sb
SFX U   che x       che             is:sg po:sb
SFX U   e   s       [ouy]e          is:sg po:sb
SFX U   e   is      [^ct]he         is:sg po:sb
SFX U   e   is      anthe           is:sg po:sb
SFX U   e   is      [blmnprstvx]e   is:sg po:sb
SFX U   o   us      eo              is:sg po:sb
SFX U   0   s       [^y]            is:pl po:sb
SFX U   y   ies     y               is:pl po:sb

SFX V Y 30
SFX V   r   r/_S    ar  ds:a is:inf
SFX V   r   r/_S    er  ds:e is:inf
SFX V   r   r/_S    ir  ds:i is:inf
SFX V   r   nte/_F  ar  ds:a is:act
SFX V   r   nte/_F  er  ds:e is:act
SFX V   r   ente/_F ir  ds:i is:act
SFX V   r   ntissime/_B     ar  ds:a is:act ds:issim
SFX V   r   ntissime/_B     er  ds:e is:act ds:issim
SFX V   r   entissime/_B    ir  ds:i is:act ds:issim
SFX V   r   te/_B       ar  ds:a is:pass
SFX V   er  ite/_B      er  ds:i is:pass
SFX V   r   te/_B       ir  ds:i is:pass
SFX V   r   tissime/_B  ar  ds:a is:pass ds:issim
SFX V   er  itissime/_B er  ds:i is:pass ds:issim
SFX V   r   tissime/_B  ir  ds:i is:pass ds:issim
SFX V   0  0    ar  ds:a is:inf  po:vb
SFX V   0  0    er  ds:e is:inf  po:vb
SFX V   0  0    ir  ds:i is:inf  po:vb
SFX V   r  0    ar  ds:a is:pres po:vb
SFX V   r  0    er  ds:e is:pres po:vb
SFX V   r  0    ir  ds:i is:pres po:vb
SFX V   r  va   ar  ds:a is:pret po:vb
SFX V   r  va   er  ds:e is:pret po:vb
SFX V   r  va   ir  ds:i is:pret po:vb
SFX V   r  ra   ar  ds:a is:fut  po:vb
SFX V   r  ra   er  ds:e is:fut  po:vb
SFX V   r  ra   ir  ds:i is:fut  po:vb
SFX V   r  rea  ar  ds:a is:cond po:vb
SFX V   r  rea  er  ds:e is:cond po:vb
SFX V   r  rea  ir  ds:i is:cond po:vb

SFX W Y 22
SFX W   r   re/_S   er  ds:0 is:inf
SFX W   r   r/_G    er  ds:0 is:inf
SFX W   r   nte/_F      [^cp]er             ds:0 is:actv
SFX W   r   nte/_F      [^ai][cp]er         ds:0 is:actv
SFX W   r   nte/_F      [^fjpsc][ai][cp]er  ds:0 is:actv
SFX W   er  iente/_F    [fjpsc][ai][cp]er   ds:0 is:actv
SFX W   r   ntissime/_B     [^cp]er             ds:0 is:actv ds:issim
SFX W   r   ntissime/_B     [^ai][cp]er         ds:0 is:actv ds:issim
SFX W   r   ntissime/_B     [^fjpsc][ai][cp]er  ds:0 is:actv ds:issim
SFX W   er  ientissime/_B   [fjpsc][ai][cp]er   ds:0 is:actv ds:issim
SFX W   er  ite/_B  er      ds:i is:pass
SFX W   -   e/_B    t-      ds:0 is:pass
SFX W   -   e/_B    [sx]-   ds:0 is:pass
SFX W   er  itissime/_B er      ds:i is:pass
SFX W   -   issime/_B   t-      ds:0 is:pass ds:issim
SFX W   -   issime/_B   [sx]-   ds:0 is:pass ds:issim
SFX W   r   re  er  ds:0 is:inf  po:vb
SFX W   r   r   er  ds:0 is:inf  po:vb
SFX W   r   0   er  ds:0 is:pres po:vb
SFX W   r   va  er  ds:0 is:pret po:vb
SFX W   r   ra  er  ds:0 is:fut  po:vb
SFX W   r   rea er  ds:0 is:cond po:vb

SFX X Y   1
SFX X   0   0/zIKH  .

PFX ] Y 20
PFX ]   0 Y  .
PFX ]   0 Z  .
PFX ]   0 E  .
PFX ]   0 P  .
PFX ]   0 T  .
PFX ]   0 G  .
PFX ]   0 M  .
PFX ]   0 k  .
PFX ]   0 h  .
PFX ]   0 da .
PFX ]   0 d  .
PFX ]   0 c  .
PFX ]   0 m  .
PFX ]   0 µ  .
PFX ]   0 n  .
PFX ]   0 p  .
PFX ]   0 f  .
PFX ]   0 a  .
PFX ]   0 z  .
PFX ]   0 y  .

PFX [ Y 41
PFX [   0 yotta  .
PFX [   0 zetta  .
PFX [   0 exa    .
PFX [   0 peta   .
PFX [   0 tera   .
PFX [   0 giga   .
PFX [   0 mega   .
PFX [   0 kilo   .
PFX [   0 hecto  [^a]
PFX [   0 hect   a[^r]
PFX [   0 deca   .
PFX [   0 deci   .
PFX [   0 centi  .
PFX [   0 milli  .
PFX [   0 micro  .
PFX [   0 nano   .
PFX [   0 pico   .
PFX [   0 femto  .
PFX [   0 atto   .
PFX [   0 zepto  .
PFX [   0 yocto  .
PFX [   0 yotta- [aiyu]
PFX [   0 zetta- [aiyu]
PFX [   0 exa-   [aiyu]
PFX [   0 peta-  [aiyu]
PFX [   0 tera-  [aiyu]
PFX [   0 giga-  [aiyu]
PFX [   0 mega-  [aiyu]
PFX [   0 kilo-  [oiyu]
PFX [   0 hecto- [oiyu]
PFX [   0 deca-  [aiu]
PFX [   0 deci-  [aeiyou]
PFX [   0 centi- [aeiyou]
PFX [   0 milli- [aeiyou]
PFX [   0 micro- [oiyu]
PFX [   0 nano-  [oiyu]
PFX [   0 pico-  [oiyu]
PFX [   0 femto- [oiyu]
PFX [   0 atto-  [oiyu]
PFX [   0 zepto- [oiyu]
PFX [   0 yocto- [oiyu]

PFX ) Y 8
PFX )   0 Ki [Bbo]
PFX )   0 Mi [Bbo]
PFX )   0 Gi [Bbo]
PFX )   0 Ti [Bbo]
PFX )   0 Pi [Bbo]
PFX )   0 Ei [Bbo]
PFX )   0 Zi [Bbo]
PFX )   0 Yi [Bbo]

PFX ( Y 16
PFX (   0 kibi   [bo][cyi]t
PFX (   0 mebi   [bo][cyi]t
PFX (   0 gigi   [bo][cyi]t
PFX (   0 tebi   [bo][cyi]t
PFX (   0 pebi   [bo][cyi]t
PFX (   0 exbi   [bo][cyi]t
PFX (   0 zebi   [bo][cyi]t
PFX (   0 yobi   [bo][cyi]t
PFX (   0 kibi-  oct
PFX (   0 mebi-  oct
PFX (   0 gigi-  oct
PFX (   0 tebi-  oct
PFX (   0 pebi-  oct
PFX (   0 exbi-  oct
PFX (   0 zebi-  oct
PFX (   0 yobi-  oct

PFX = Y 39
PFX =   contra  contra- contra[aiyu]
PFX =   extra   extra-  extra[aiyu]
PFX =   infra   infra-  infra[aiyu]
PFX =   intra   intra-  intra[aiyu]
PFX =   meta    meta-   meta[aiyu]
PFX =   para    para-   para[aiyu]
PFX =   supra   supra-  supra[aiyu]
PFX =   ultra   ultra-  ultra[aiyu]
PFX =   mega    mega-   mega[aiyu]
PFX =   bi      bi-     bi[aeiyou]
PFX =   amphi   amphi-  amphi[aeiyou]
PFX =   archi   archi-  archi[aeiyou]
PFX =   anti    anti-   anti[aeiyou]
PFX =   mini    mini-   mini[aeiyou]
PFX =   multi   multi-  multi[aeiyou]
PFX =   pluri   pluri-  pluri[aeiyou]
PFX =   quasi   quasi-  quasi
PFX =   semi    semi-   semi[aeiyou]
PFX =   pre     pre-    pre[eiyu]
PFX =   re      re-     re[eiyu]
PFX =   tele    tele-   tele[eiyu]
PFX =   vice    vice-   vice[eiyu]
PFX =   auto    auto-   auto[oiyu]
PFX =   centro  centro- centro[aeiyou]
PFX =   co      co-     co[oiyu]
PFX =   endo    endo-   endo[oiyu]
PFX =   exo     exo-    exo[oiyu]
PFX =   geo     geo-    geo[aiyu]
PFX =   hypo    hypo-   hypo[oiyu]
PFX =   macro   macro-  macro[oiyu]
PFX =   micro   micro-  micro[oiyu]
PFX =   mono    mono-   mono[oiyu]
PFX =   neo     neo-    neo[oiyu]
PFX =   pro     pro-    pro[oiyu]
PFX =   proto   proto-  proto[oiyu]
PFX =   pseudo  pseudo- pseudo[oiyu]
PFX =   retro   retro-  retro[oiyu]
PFX =   poly    poly-   poly[aeiyou]
PFX =   post    post-   postt
