custom-dicts/ia.dic
AT/_GL!]|
Ah/_GL!]|
As/_GL!]|
B/_GL!)|
B/_GL!]|
Ba/_GL!]|
Bq/_GL!]|
C/_GL!]|
CV/_GL!]|
Ci/_GL!]|
Da/_GL!]|
F/_GL!]|
G/_GL!]|
Gy/_GL!]|
H/_GL!]|
Hz/_GL!]|
J/_GL!]|
Js/_GL!]|
K/_GL!]|
L/_GL!]|
N/_GL!]|
Nm/_GL!]|
Np/_GL!]|
Ns/_GL!]|
S/_GL!]|
T/_GL!]|
V/_GL!]|
Vs/_GL!]|
Wb/_GL!]|
Ws/_GL!]|
accrescer/_Wm
acutiar/_Vmt
affluer/_Wd
agitar/_Vint
aha-erlebnis/_GT
alcalose/_U
amortisar/_Vbcnt
amperehora/_S[
amperesecunda/_S[
amperetorno/_S[
androsporangium/_T
angstrom/_GL![
angström/_GL![
anthemide/_U
antiabortista/_E=q
antialcoholista/_E=q
antiauxina/_S=
antienzyma/_S=
antiimperialista/_E=q
antiisolationista/_E=q
applanar/_Vbcm
apprehens-/_Wbcnv
ar/_SL[
artiozoon/_T
assediar/_Vmt
athermobiose/_U
atm/_GL!]|
atmosphera/_S[q
autodestruct-/_Wntv
autoimmun/_E=k
autointoxication/_S=
avantiar/_Vm
b/_GL!)|
bar/_GL!]|
bar/_S[
baria/_S[
barn/_UL[
basidiosporangium/_T
basketball/_U
baud/_UL[
becquerel/_UL[
biacuminate/_A=
biauricular/_E=
biscuitar/_Ve
bit/_U([
blockhaus/_GT
bostryce/_U
bryozoon/_T
byte/_S([
cablar/_Vt
caisson/_U
candela/_S[
carburar/_Vnt
cataclase/_U
cd/_GL!]|
centroavante/_G=
ceterum/_T
chaperonar/_Vg
cholecystite/_U
circumlocut-/_Win
clivar/_Vg
coliinfection/_S=
colliculite/_U
colloquer/_W
compassar/_V
concept-/_Wnv
conjecturar/_Vbc
conjunger/_W
continuum/_T
contraattacco/_S=
contract-/_Wbcntuv
convitar/_V
cooptar/_V=n
coproduct-/_Wnt
cross-country/_U!
ctenidium/_T
curie/_S[
deci/_Xl
declinar/_Vbcint
deconstruer/_W
delphinium/_T
demodice/_U
depolarisar/_Vnt
depress-/_Wntv
diffider/_Wd
disannidar/_Vt
discrescer/_Wm
disinebriar/_V
disrumper/_W
distressar/_V
double-crossing-over/_U!
duraluminium/_T
dyna/_S[
eV/_GL!]|
ecloder/_W
electronvolt/_UL[
electroosmose/_U
eleutherozoon/_T
enterozoon/_T
epirogenese/_U
epizoon/_T
equiponderar/_Vd
erumper/_W
exhaust-/_Wbcnvw
expulicar/_Vjn
extruder/_W
fabliau/_GT
ferrosilicium/_T
fibrosite/_U
formatar/_Vgn
furer/_W
föhn/_GT
gal/_UL[
gamogenese/_Uq
geoanticlinal/_S=
glockenspiel/_GT
gourmand/_U
gramma/_S[
guidar/_Vt
harmonium/_T
hectar/_SL[
hematolyse/_U
hertz/_GL[
hormonogenese/_Uq
hydrozoon/_T
iconostase/_U
immurar/_Vmn
incider/_Wd
inflar/_Vbcn
injicer/_W
intermiss-/_Wnv
intonnar/_Vm
intraalveolar/_E=
inverter/_Wbct
jazzman/_GT
joulesecunda/_S[
jumbojet/_U
kat/_GL!]|
kelvin/_UL[
kronprinz/_GT
leitmotiv/_GT
lipogenese/_U
liquidar/_Vbcnt
lm/_GL!]|
lumen/_S[
lux/_GL[
lx/_GL!]|
m/_GL!]|
macrosporangium/_T
manumiss-/_Wn
maxwell/_UL[
megainterprisa/_S=
megapixel/_U
megaron/_T
merendar/_V
mesothorium/_T
microinterruption/_S=
microzoon/_T
mol/_GL!]|
mol/_UL[
monogenese/_Uq
multiangular/_E=
mutilar/_Vint
myroxylon/_T
necrose/_Uq
neoimpressionista/_E=q
newtonmetro/_S[
nonagi/_Xlxy
nonaginta/_Xl
not-/_Win
o/_GL!)|
octetto/_S(
octogi/_Xlxy
octoginta/_Xl
oersted/_UL[
ohmmetro/_S[
oleum/_T
one-man show/_U!
optimum/_T
orthographiar/_V
packaging/_U
pallium/_T
parer/_W
passe-partout/_U
patagium/_T
perivaginite/_U
peroxydar/_Vn
pervent-/_W
pfennig/_GT
picride/_U
pilum/_T
pièze/_S[
pole-position/_U!
polyacide/_A=
polyalgia/_S=
polyantheme/_A=
polyembryonia/_S=q
polyinsaturate/_A=
post scriptum/_T
posttraumatic/_A=
precoct-/_W
predar/_Vint
preerupive/_A=
preimprimer/_W=
prescinder/_W
project-/_Wntuvw
proteolyse/_Uq
protozoon/_T
pruinar/_V
putrefact-/_Wnv
quadragi/_Xlxy
quadraginta/_Xl
quasicecitate/_S=
quasidesertic/_A=
quasiinexistentia/_S=
quasiquotidian/_A=
quasiunanime/_E=k
quinquagi/_Xlxy
quinquaginta/_Xl
quisling/_U
radiano/_S[
reappris-/_W
reascoltar/_V
reconcess-/_W
redescens-/_W
reeliger/_W=bc
reempleo/_S=
reentrar/_V=
reevalutar/_V=n
reflecter/_Wd
reificar/_V=n
reimpress-/_W=n
reingagiar/_V=m
reinstallar/_V=n
reinvitar/_V=
relavar/_Vu
relinquer/_W
repress-/_Wbcntv
resimilar/_Vd
resumer/_Wt
revincer/_W
ripple-mark/_U!
rondeau/_GT
rufflanar/_Ve
röntgen/_UL[
s/_GL!]|
scoliose/_Uq
scyphozoon/_T
semianular/_E=
semiimpermeabile/_E=
septuagi/_Xlxy
septuaginta/_Xl
sexagi/_Xlxy
sexaginta/_Xl
sextuplicar/_Vn
showman/_GT
siemens/_GL[
sinape/_U
sn/_GL!)|
spermatocystite/_U
sportsman/_GT
steradiano/_S[
stetson/_U
stris-/_W
structurar/_Vbcn
superflux-/_W
swingar/_V
syncytium/_T
syngenese/_Uq
t/_GL!]|
tesla/_S[
thermokarst/_GT
thermolyse/_Uq
torr/_UL[
tracheite/_U
transferer/_Vbcdm
transgress-/_Wintv
trigi/_Xlxy
triginta/_Xl
tympanite/_U
ua/_GL!]|
var/_GL!]|
vassallisar/_Vn
vigi/_Xlxy
viginti/_SXl
voltampere-hora/_S[
voltamperehora/_S[
walkman/_GT
watt/_UL[
wattmetro/_S[
web-cam/_U!
Å/_GL!]|
ångström/_GL![
